Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.020

Residence—Bond—Oath.

The state treasurer shall reside and keep his or her office at the seat of government. Before entering upon his or her duties, he or she shall execute and deliver to the secretary of state a bond to the state in a sum of not less than five hundred thousand dollars, to be approved by the secretary of state and one of the justices of the supreme court, conditioned to pay all moneys at such times as required by law, and for the faithful performance of all duties required of him or her by law. He or she shall take an oath of office, to be indorsed on his or her commission, and file a copy thereof, together with the bond, in the office of the secretary of state.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5032; 1972 ex.s. c 12 s 1. Prior: 1971 c 81 s 108; 1971 c 14 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.020; prior: 1890 p 642 s 2; RRS s 11022; prior: 1886 p 133 s 1; 1881 p 18 s 1; 1871 p 76 s 1; 1864 p 51 s 2; 1854 p 413 s 2.]